Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5439.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "homeless advocacy fund act". Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Department" means the department of treasury. (b) "Fund" means the homeless advocacy fund created in section 5. Sec. 5. (1) The homeless advocacy fund is created in the department to provide funds for donation to the Michigan coalition against homelessness to improve and support policies and systems to end homelessness and to provide programs, services, and support for individuals and families experiencing homelessness. The department is the administrator of the fund for auditing purposes. (2) The state treasurer shall credit to the fund all amounts appropriated for this purpose under section 435 of the income tax act of 1967, 1967 PA 281, MCL 206.435. (3) The fund shall consist of the money credited to the fund pursuant to section 435 of the income tax act of 1967, 1967 PA 281, MCL 206.435, any interest and earnings accruing from the saving and investment of that money, and other appropriations, money, or other things of value received by the fund. (4) The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the fund. Sec. 7. (1) The money, interest, and earnings of the fund must be expended solely for the purposes described in this act. (2) Money granted or received as a gift or donation to the fund is available for distribution upon appropriation to the Michigan coalition against homelessness. Sec. 9. The money in the fund that is available for distribution must be appropriated each year. Money in the fund at the close of the year remains in the fund and does not lapse to the general fund. Enacting section 1. This act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S04795'25) or House Bill No. 5440 (request no. H04795'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.